West Virginia, session 2026, SB619.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2L. STOP THE BLEED ACT. §18-2L-1. Title of article. This article shall be known as the Stop the Bleed Act. §18-2L-2. Definitions. "Bleeding control kit" means a first aid response kit that contains at least the following:(1) One tourniquet endorsed by the Committee on Tactical Combat Casualty Care;(2) A compression bandage;(3) Gauze dressing that can be used to apply pressure or pack a wound;(4) Protective gloves and a permanent marker;(5) Scissors; (6) Instructional documents developed by the Stop the Bleed national awareness campaign of the United States Department of Homeland Security or the American College of Surgeons on Trauma, or both.(6) Other medical materials and equipment similar to those described in subdivisions (1) through (3) may be included provided that:(A) Can adequately treat a traumatic injury; and(B) Can be stored in a readily available kit. §18-2L-3. Implementation of the Stop the Bleed Act. (a) Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, each county board of education shall develop a Stop the Bleed (bleeding control) program which shall include the following requirements:(1) Designate bleeding control kits assigned to classrooms and common areas in easily accessible locations to be determined in conjunction with local first responders or the school safety specialist;(2) Include bleeding control kits in the emergency plans of the school, including but not limited to the presentation and use of the bleeding control kits in all drills and emergencies;(3) Provide bleeding control training every other year to faculty and staff of the school district that includes:  (A) Recognition of life-threatening bleeding / hemorrhage;(B) The proper application of direct pressure to control bleeding;(C) The packing of wounds with dressings or bandages to control bleeding; and(D) The correct application of tourniquets.(4) Incorporate bleeding control training into the curriculum for students in grades nine through twelve (9-12); (5) Require bleeding control kits in school inventories to be inspected annually to ensure that materials, supplies, and equipment are replaced, as necessary;(6) Require a bleeding control kit to be restocked after each use and materials, supplies, and equipment to be replaced, as necessary, to ensure that the bleeding control kit contains all necessary materials, supplies, and equipment.(b) The county boards of education, in collaboration with the county boards of health and county Homeland Security, shall develop and provide training for the use of bleeding control kits. The county boards of health and county Homeland Security may satisfy the training requirements by using training, including online didactic training with an in-person hands-on skills component, available from the American College of Surgeons or similar organization.(c) In all matters relating to a bleeding control program, school personnel are immune from civil liability for any act done or omitted in the use of a bleeding control kit unless the action constitutes gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct. §18-2L-4. Funding for Stop the Bleed Act. Funding to purchase sufficient bleeding control kits may be funded by individual donations, gifts or by an appropriation by the Legislature for such purpose.